Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1314
Entry of judgment by court; when required.

Where the verdict is special, or where there has been a special finding on particular questions of fact, or where the court has ordered the case to be reserved, it shall order what judgment shall be entered.

R.S.1867, Code § 439, p. 467;

R.S.1913, § 8007;

C.S.1922, § 8948;

C.S.1929, § 20-1314;

R.S.1943, § 25-1314.

Special circumstances of case required trial court to order what judgment should be entered. Bell v. Crook, 168 Neb. 685, 97 N.W.2d 352 (1959).